Hawaii statutes.
§201B-2 Hawaii tourism authority;
establishment; board; president and chief executive officer. (a) There
is established the Hawaii tourism authority, which shall be a body corporate
and a public instrumentality of the State, for the purpose of implementing this
chapter. The authority shall be placed within the department of business,
economic development, and tourism for administrative purposes only.

(b) The authority shall be headed by a
policy-making board of directors that shall consist of twelve members; provided
that:

(1) The members shall be appointed by the governor as
provided in section 26-34, except as provided by this section;

(2) The members shall include at least one
representative each from the city and county of Honolulu and the counties of
Hawaii, Kauai, and Maui;

(3) Three members shall be appointed by the governor
from a list of three names submitted for each appointment by the president of
the senate, and three members shall be appointed by the governor from a list of
three names submitted for each appointment by the speaker of the house of
representatives; provided that if fewer than three names are submitted for each
appointment, the governor may disregard the list;

(4) At least six members shall have knowledge,
experience, and expertise in the area of accommodations, transportation,
retail, entertainment, or attractions, and at least one member appointed by the
governor shall have knowledge, experience, and expertise in the area of
Hawaiian cultural practices; provided that no more than three members shall
represent, be employed by, or be under contract to any sector of the industry
represented on the board;

(5) The governor shall make appointments to ensure
the fulfillment of all requirements of paragraphs (2) and (4); provided that upon
the occurrence of a vacancy subject to paragraph (3), the governor shall notify
the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives of
any unfulfilled requirements pursuant to paragraphs (2) and (4), and the
president of the senate or the speaker of the house of representatives, as
appropriate, shall submit nominees who fulfill those requirements; and

(6) No person who has served as a member of the board
of directors of the Hawaii Visitors and Convention Bureau shall be eligible to
sit as a member of the board of directors of the Hawaii tourism authority until
at least two years have expired between the person's termination from service
on the Hawaii Visitors and Convention Bureau board and the person's appointment
to the authority's board of directors.

(c) Members shall be appointed by the
governor for terms of four years; provided that membership on the board shall
not exceed eight consecutive years; provided further that each member shall
hold office until the member's successor is appointed and qualified.

(d) The board shall elect a chairperson
from among the members.

(e) Seven members shall constitute a
quorum and a minimum of seven affirmative votes shall be necessary for all
actions by the authority. The members shall serve without compensation, but
shall be reimbursed for expenses, including traveling expenses, necessary for
the performance of their duties.

(f) The board shall appoint one person to
serve as president and chief executive officer, exempt from chapters 76 and 88
who shall oversee the authority staff; provided that the compensation package,
including salary, shall not exceed fifteen per cent of the 3.5 per cent
authorized for administrative expenses under section 201B-11(c); and provided
further that the compensation package shall not include private sector moneys
or other contributions. The board shall set the president and chief executive
officer's duties, responsibilities, holidays, vacations, leaves, hours of work,
and working conditions. It may grant other benefits as it deems necessary. [L
1998, c 156, pt of §2; am L 2000, c 253, §150; am L 2002, c 143, §2 and c 148,
§19; am L 2003, c 3, §3; am L 2004, c 10, §7 and c 58, §§6, 14(2); am L 2005, c
22, §§46, 50 and c 235, §4; am L 2006, c 306, §1; am L 2007, c 187, §2; am L Sp
2009, c 5, §§4, 12; am L 2010, c 102, §5; am L 2015, c 46, §1]

Note

Appointments to the board made after July 1, 2015, shall be
made in accordance with qualifications under subsection (b), as amended by L
2015, c 46. L 2015, c 46, §3.

Revision Note

In subsection (b)(5), "July 1, 2002" substituted
for "the effective date of this Act".

Attorney General Opinions

Subsection (c) is constitutional, with regard to the use of
the phrase "appointed and qualified" to describe when a successor's
appointment terminates a holdover member's position. Att. Gen. Op. 16-3.

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next